sv: Inkluderade komponenter: Bromsband + koppling/krok; Bromsband + fästanordningar; Bromsband + fjäder; Bromsband + spännvred; Endast bromsband; Bärväska; Komplett bromsbandskit; Extra pipar/munstycken; Värmebeständiga handskar; Bruksanvisning; Måttbägare; Utbytesblad; Omrörare; Termometerklämma; Centreringsverktyg för vekar; Vekklistermärken; Övrigt
hu: Mellékelt alkatrészek: Fékszalag + csatlakozó/horog; Fékszalag + rögzítők; Fékszalag + rugó; Fékszalag + feszítőgomb; Csak fékszalag; Hordtáska; Teljes fékszalagkészlet; Pótcsőrök/hegyek; Hőálló kesztyű; Használati útmutató; Mérőpohár; Cserepengék; Keverő; Hőmérő csíptető; Kanócközpontosító rudak; Kanócragasztók; Egyéb
ko: 포함된 구성 요소: 브레이크 밴드 + 커넥터/후크; 브레이크 밴드 + 패스너; 브레이크 밴드 + 스프링; 브레이크 밴드 + 텐션 노브; 브레이크 밴드 전용; 휴대용 케이스; 전체 브레이크 밴드 키트; 여분 스파우트/팁; 내열 장갑; 사용 설명서; 계량컵; 교체용 블레이드; 교반기; 온도계 클립; 심지 고정 바; 심지 스티커; 기타
fr: Composants inclus: Sangle de frein + connecteur/crochet; Sangle de frein + attaches; Sangle de frein + ressort; Sangle de frein + molette de tension; Sangle de frein uniquement; Étui de transport; Kit de sangle de frein complet; Buses/embouts supplémentaires; Gants thermorésistants; Manuel d’instructions; Verre doseur; Lames de rechange; Agitateur; Pince pour thermomètre; Tiges de centrage de mèche; Autocollants pour mèche; Autre
es: Componentes incluidos: Banda de freno + conector/gancho; Banda de freno + fijadores; Banda de freno + resorte; Banda de freno + perilla de tensión; Solo banda de freno; Estuche de transporte; Kit completo de banda de freno; Boquillas/puntas adicionales; Guantes resistentes al calor; Manual de instrucciones; Taza medidora; Cuchillas de repuesto; Agitador; Clip para termómetro; Barras centradoras de mechas; Adhesivos para mechas; Otro
ja: 含まれるコンポーネント: ブレーキバンド＋コネクター/フック; ブレーキバンド＋ファスナー; ブレーキバンド＋スプリング; ブレーキバンド＋テンションノブ; ブレーキバンドのみ; キャリングケース; ブレーキバンド一式; 予備の注ぎ口/チップ; 耐熱グローブ; 取扱説明書; 計量カップ; 替刃; マドラー/撹拌棒; 温度計クリップ; ウィックセンタリングバー; ウィックステッカー; その他
tr: Dahil edilen bileşenler: Fren bandı + konektör/kanca; Fren bandı + sabitleyiciler; Fren bandı + yay; Fren bandı + gergi düğmesi; Yalnızca fren bandı; Taşıma çantası; Eksiksiz fren bandı kiti; Ekstra uçlar/başlıklar; Isıya dayanıklı eldivenler; Kullanım kılavuzu; Ölçü kabı; Yedek bıçaklar; Karıştırıcı; Termometre klipsi; Fitil merkezleme çubukları; Fitil çıkartmaları; Diğer
hr-HR: Uključene komponente: Pojas kočnice + priključak/kuka; Pojas kočnice + pričvršćivači; Pojas kočnice + opruga; Pojas kočnice + gumb za zatezanje; Samo pojas kočnice; Kovčeg za nošenje; Komplet pojasa kočnice; Dodatni izljevi/vrhovi; Rukavice otporne na toplinu; Upute za upotrebu; Mjerna posuda; Zamjenske oštrice; Mješalica; Kopča termometra; Držači za centriranje fitilja; Naljepnice za fitilj; Ostalo
nl: Meegeleverde onderdelen: Remband + connector/haak; Remband + bevestigingsmiddelen; Remband + veer; Remband + spanknop; Alleen remband; Draagtas; Complete rembandkit; Extra tuiten/tips; Hittebestendige handschoenen; Handleiding; Maatbeker; Vervangende mesjes; Roerstaaf; Thermometerclip; Lontcentreerstaven; Lontstickers; Overige
ru: Комплектующие в комплекте: Тормозная лента + коннектор/крючок; Тормозная лента + крепеж; Тормозная лента + пружина; Тормозная лента + ручка натяжения; Только тормозная лента; Кейс для переноски; Полный комплект тормозной ленты; Дополнительные носики/насадки; Термостойкие перчатки; Инструкция по эксплуатации; Мерный стакан; Сменные лезвия; Мешалка; Зажим для термометра; Держатели для центрирования фитиля; Наклейки для фитиля; Другое
zh-CN: 包含组件: 刹车带 + 连接器/挂钩; 刹车带 + 紧固件; 刹车带 + 弹簧; 刹车带 + 张力旋钮; 仅刹车带; 便携手提箱; 完整刹车带套件; 备用喷嘴/吸嘴; 耐热手套; 说明书; 量杯; 替换刀片; 搅拌棒; 温度计夹; 烛芯固定架; 烛芯贴; 其他
vi: Các thành phần đi kèm: Đai phanh + móc/đầu nối; Đai phanh + chốt gài; Đai phanh + lò xo; Đai phanh + núm chỉnh lực căng; Chỉ đai phanh; Hộp/Túi đựng; Bộ đai phanh hoàn chỉnh; Đầu vòi/đầu rót dự phòng; Găng tay chịu nhiệt; Sổ tay hướng dẫn; Cốc đong; Lưỡi dao/cánh thay thế; Que khuấy; Kẹp nhiệt kế; Thanh giữ bấc; Miếng dán bấc; Khác
lt-LT: Įtraukti komponentai: Stabdžių juosta + jungtis / kablys; Stabdžių juosta + tvirtinimo detalės; Stabdžių juosta + spyruoklė; Stabdžių juosta + įtempimo rankenėlė; Tik stabdžių juosta; Nešiojimo dėklas; Pilnas stabdžių juostos rinkinys; Papildomi snapeliai / antgaliai; Karščiui atsparios pirštinės; Naudojimo instrukcija; Matavimo indas; Atsarginiai peiliukai; Maišiklis; Termometro segtukas; Dagčio centravimo juostelės; Dagčio lipdukai; Kita
pl: Dołączone elementy: Taśma hamulcowa + łącznik/haczyk; Taśma hamulcowa + elementy mocujące; Taśma hamulcowa + sprężyna; Taśma hamulcowa + pokrętło naprężenia; Tylko taśma hamulcowa; Etui do przenoszenia; Kompletny zestaw taśmy hamulcowej; Dodatkowe dysze/końcówki; Rękawice żaroodporne; Instrukcja obsługi; Miarka; Ostrza wymienne; Mieszadło; Klips do termometru; Uchwyty centrujące do knotów; Naklejki do knotów; Inne
bg-BG: Включени компоненти: Спирачна лента + конектор/кука; Спирачна лента + крепежни елементи; Спирачна лента + пружина; Спирачна лента + копче за натягане; Само спирачна лента; Калъф за носене; Пълен комплект спирачна лента; Допълнителни накрайници; Термоустойчиви ръкавици; Ръководство за употреба; Мерителна чашка; Резервни остриета; Бъркалка; Клипс за термометър; Държачи за центриране на фитил; Лепенки за фитил; Други
pt-BR: Componentes incluídos: Cinta de freio + conector/gancho; Cinta de freio + fixadores; Cinta de freio + mola; Cinta de freio + botão de tensão; Apenas cinta de freio; Estojo de transporte; Kit de cinta de freio completo; Bicos/pontas extras; Luvas resistentes ao calor; Manual de instruções; Copo medidor; Lâminas de reposição; Agitador; Clipe de termômetro; Barras centralizadoras de pavio; Adesivos para pavio; Outros
en: Included components: Brake band + connector/hook; Brake band + fasteners; Brake band + spring; Brake band + tension knob; Brake band only; Carrying case; Complete brake band kit; Extra spouts/tips; Heat-resistant gloves; Instruction manual; Measuring cup; Replacement blades; Stirrer; Thermometer clip; Wick centering bars; Wick stickers; Other
pt-PT: Componentes incluídos: Cinta de travão + conector/gancho; Cinta de travão + fixadores; Cinta de travão + mola; Cinta de travão + botão de tensão; Apenas cinta de travão; Estojo de transporte; Kit de cinta de travão completo; Bicos/pontas extra; Luvas resistentes ao calor; Manual de instruções; Copo medidor; Lâminas de substituição; Agitador; Mola para termómetro; Barras de centragem de pavio; Adesivos para pavio; Outro
it: Componenti inclusi: Fascia frenante + connettore/gancio; Fascia frenante + elementi di fissaggio; Fascia frenante + molla; Fascia frenante + manopola di tensione; Solo fascia frenante; Custodia per il trasporto; Kit fascia frenante completo; Ugelli/punte extra; Guanti termoresistenti; Manuale di istruzioni; Misurino; Lame di ricambio; Agitatore; Clip per termometro; Barre di centraggio per stoppino; Adesivi per stoppino; Altro
ro-RO: Componente incluse: Bandă de frână + conector/cârlig; Bandă de frână + elemente de fixare; Bandă de frână + arc; Bandă de frână + buton de tensionare; Doar bandă de frână; Cutie de transport; Kit complet bandă de frână; Capete/duze suplimentare; Mănuși rezistente la căldură; Manual de instrucțiuni; Cană de măsurat; Lame de rezervă; Agitator; Clemă pentru termometru; Bare de centrare a fitilului; Autocolante pentru fitil; Altele
th: ส่วนประกอบที่รวมอยู่: แถบเบรก + ตัวเชื่อมต่อ/ตะขอ; แถบเบรก + ตัวยึด; แถบเบรก + สปริง; แถบเบรก + ลูกบิดปรับความตึง; แถบเบรกเท่านั้น; กระเป๋าพกพา; ชุดเครื่องมือแถบเบรกครบชุด; พวย/ปลายปากเพิ่มเติม; ถุงมือทนความร้อน; คู่มือการใช้งาน; ถ้วยตวง; ใบมีดอะไหล่; ที่คน; คลิปเทอร์โมมิเตอร์; แท่งจัดไส้เทียนให้อยู่ตรงกลาง; สติกเกอร์ติดไส้เทียน; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Zahrnuté komponenty: Brzdový pás + spojka/hák; Brzdový pás + upevňovacie prvky; Brzdový pás + pružina; Brzdový pás + gombík napínania; Iba brzdový pás; Puzdro na prenášanie; Kompletná súprava brzdového pásu; Extra hrdlá/špičky; Teplovzdorné rukavice; Návod na použitie; Odmerka; Náhradné čepele; Miešadlo; Spona na teplomer; Centrovacie tyčinky na knôty; Nálepky na knôty; Iné
fi: Mukana tulevat komponentit: Jarruhihna ja liitin/koukku; Jarruhihna ja kiinnikkeet; Jarruhihna ja jousi; Jarruhihna ja kiristysnuppi; Vain jarruhihna; Kantokotelo; Täydellinen jarruhihnasarja; Ylimääräiset suuttimet/kärjet; Lämmönkestävät käsineet; Käyttöopas; Mittakuppi; Vaihtoterät; Sekoitin; Lämpömittarin pidike; Sydänlangan keskitystuet; Sydänlangan tarrat; Muu
zh-TW: 隨附組件: 煞車帶 + 連接器/掛鉤; 煞車帶 + 緊固件; 煞車帶 + 彈簧; 煞車帶 + 張力旋鈕; 僅煞車帶; 收納盒; 完整煞車帶套件; 額外噴嘴/尖頭; 耐熱手套; 說明書; 量杯; 替換刀片; 攪拌棒; 溫度計夾; 燭芯置中器; 燭芯底座貼; 其他
nb: Inkluderte komponenter: Bremsebånd + kobling/krok; Bremsebånd + fester; Bremsebånd + fjær; Bremsebånd + strammeknott; Kun bremsebånd; Bæreveske; Komplett bremsebåndsett; Ekstra tuter/spisser; Varmebestandige hansker; Bruksanvisning; Målebeger; Reserveblader; Rørepinne; Termometerklips; Sentreringsverktøy for veke; Klistremerker for veker; Annet
de: Enthaltene Komponenten: Bremsband + Verbindungsstück/Haken; Bremsband + Befestigungselemente; Bremsband + Feder; Bremsband + Spannknopf; Nur Bremsband; Tragetasche; Komplettes Bremsband-Paket; Zusätzliche Tüllen/Spitzen; Hitzebeständige Handschuhe; Bedienungsanleitung; Messbecher; Ersatzklingen; Rührstab; Thermometer-Clip; Dochtzentrierstäbe; Dochtkleber; Sonstige
cs: Součásti v balení: Brzdový pás + konektor/háček; Brzdový pás + spojovací materiál; Brzdový pás + pružina; Brzdový pás + napínací šroub; Pouze brzdový pás; Přepravní pouzdro; Kompletní sada brzdového pásu; Náhradní trysky/hroty; Žáruvzdorné rukavice; Návod k použití; Odměrka; Náhradní čepele; Míchátko; Klip na teploměr; Centrovače knotů; Nálepky na knoty; Jiné
da: Medfølgende komponenter: Bremsebånd + stik/krog; Bremsebånd + beslag; Bremsebånd + fjeder; Bremsebånd + spændeskrue; Kun bremsebånd; Bæretaske; Komplet bremsebåndssæt; Ekstra tude/spidser; Varmebestandige handsker; Brugsanvisning; Målebæger; Reserveblade; Omrører; Termometerklemme; Vægecentreringsstænger; Vægeklistermærker; Andet
sl-SI: Vključene komponente: Zavorni trak + priključek/kavelj; Zavorni trak + pritrdilni elementi; Zavorni trak + vzmet; Zavorni trak + gumb za napetost; Samo zavorni trak; Kovček za prenašanje; Celoten komplet zavornega traku; Dodatni dulci/nastavki; Na vročino odporne rokavice; Navodila za uporabo; Merilna posodica; Nadomestna rezila; Mešalnik; Sponka za termometer; Palčke za centriranje stenja; Nalepke za stenj; Drugo
el: Περιλαμβανόμενα εξαρτήματα: Ταινία φρένου + σύνδεσμος/άγκιστρο; Ταινία φρένου + στοιχεία στερέωσης; Ταινία φρένου + ελατήριο; Ταινία φρένου + λαβή τάνυσης; Μόνο ταινία φρένου; Θήκη μεταφοράς; Πλήρες κιτ ταινίας φρένου; Επιπλέον στόμια/άκρα; Γάντια ανθεκτικά στη θερμότητα; Εγχειρίδιο οδηγιών; Κύπελλο μέτρησης; Ανταλλακτικές λεπίδες; Αναδευτήρας; Κλιπ θερμομέτρου; Μπάρες κεντραρίσματος φυτιλιού; Αυτοκόλλητα φυτιλιού; Άλλο